Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3333
Seizure of obligor's property; notice of arrearage; contents; appeal.

(1) In a case which is receiving services under Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, when the department has made reasonable efforts to verify and has reason to believe payment on a support order is in arrears in an amount equal to the support due and payable for more than a three-month period of time or upon the request of the state agency of another state which administers Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act, and therefor determines to seize an obligor's property, the department shall send written notice to the obligor by first-class mail to the last-known address of the obligor or to the last-known address of the obligor available to the court pursuant to section 42-364.13. For purposes of this section, reasonable efforts to verify means reviewing the case file and having written or oral communication with the clerk of the district court.

(2) The notice of arrearage shall:

(a) Specify the court or agency which issued the support order;

(b) Specify the arrearage under the support order which the obligor owes as of the date of the notice or other date certain;

(c) Specify that any enforcement action will incorporate any arrearage which may accrue in the future;

(d) State clearly, "Your property may be seized without further notice if you do not respond or clear up the arrearage"; and

(e) Specify that within twenty days after the notice is mailed, the obligor may request, in writing, a hearing to contest a mistake of fact. For purposes of this section, mistake of fact means an error in the amount of the arrearage or an error in the identity of the obligor.

(3) If the obligor files a written request for a hearing based upon a mistake of fact within twenty days after the notice is mailed, the department shall provide an opportunity for a hearing and shall stay enforcement action under sections 43-3333 to 43-3337 until the administrative appeal process is completed.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 33;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 164.